Thank you, Lester. Our jobs are fleeing the country. They're going to Mexico they’re going to many other countries. You look at what China is doing for country in terms of making our product, they're devaluing their currency and there's nobody in our government to fight them. And we have a very good fight and we have a winning fight. Because they’re using our country as a piggy bank to rebuild China and many other countries are doing the same thing. So we are losing our good jobs, so many of them. When you look at what's happening in Mexico, a friend of mine who builds plants, said it's the eighth wonder of the world. They’re building some of the biggest plants anywhere in the world, some of the most sophisticated, some of the best plants. With the United States, as he said, not so much. So Ford is leaving, you see that their small car division, leaving. Thousands of jobs leaving Michigan, leaving Ohio, they’re all leaving. And we can't allow to happen anymore. As far as child care is concerned and so many of the things I think Hillary and I agree on that. We probably disagree a little bit as to numbers and amounts and what we’re going to do but perhaps will be talking about that later. But we have to stop our jobs from being stolen from us. We have to stop our companies from leaving the United States and with it, firing all of their people. All the have to do is take a look at Carrier air-conditioning in Indianapolis. They left fourteen hundred people. They are going to Mexico. So many hundreds and hundreds of companies are doing this. We cannot let it happen. Under my plan I will be reducing taxes tremendously from thirty five percent to fifteen percent for companies, small and big businesses. That's going to be a job creator like we haven't seen since Ronald Reagan. It's going to be a beautiful thing to watch. Companies will come, they will build, they will expand, new companies will start and I look very very much forward to doing it. We have to renegotiate our trade deals and we have to stop these countries from stealing our companies and our jobs.

Well, for one thing and before we start on that my father gave me a very small loan in 1975 and I built into a company that's worth many many billions of dollars with some of the greatest assets in the world and I say that only because that's the kind of thinking that our country needs. Our country is in deep trouble. We don't know what we’re doing when it comes to devaluations and all of these countries all over the world, especially China. They're the best the best ever at it. What they’re doing to us is a very very sad thing. So we have to do that. We had to renegotiate our trade deals and Lester, they’re taking our jobs. They’re giving incentives, they’re doing things that frankly we don't do. Let me give you the example of Mexico. They have a vat tax, we’re on a different system. When we sell into Mexico there is a tax when they sell an automatic sixteen percent approximately. When they sell into us there's no tax. It’s a defective agreement. It's been defective for a long time, many years, but the politicians haven’t done anything about it. Now in all fairness to Secretary Clinton...yes? Is that okay? Good, I want you to be very happy. It’s very important to me. But in all fairness to Secretary Clinton, when she started talking about this it was really very recently, she's been doing this for thirty years and why hasn't she made the agreements better? The NAFTA agreement is defective. Just because of the tax and many other reasons but just because of the tax.

Secretary Clinton and others, politicians, should have been doing this for years. Now right now because of the fact that we created a movement. They should've been doing this for years. What's happened to our jobs and our country and our economy generally is look -- we owe twenty trillion dollars. We cannot do it any longer, Lester.

Well, the first thing you do is don't let the jobs leave. The companies are leaving. I could name, I mean there are thousands of them, they’re leaving and they’re leaving in bigger numbers than ever. And what you do is you say fine, you want to go to Mexico or some other country, good luck, we wish you a lot of luck. But if you think you're going to make your air conditioners or your cars, or your cookies or whatever you make, and bring them into our country without a tax, you're wrong. And once you say you’re going to tax them coming in and our politicians never do this because they have special interests and the special interests want those companies to leave because in many cases they own the companies. So what I'm saying is we can stop them from leaving, we have to stop them from leaving, and that's a big big factor.

That called business, by the way.

and would, in some instances, disadvantage middle-class families compared to the wealthy, were to go into effect, we would lose three and a half million jobs. And maybe have another recession. They’ve looked at my plans, and they’ve said okay, if we can do this, and I intend to get it done, we will have ten million more new jobs. Because we will be making investments where we can grow the economy. Take clean energy. Some country is going to be the clean energy superpower of the twenty first century. Donald thinks that climate change is a hoax perpetrated by the Chinese. I think it's real.

I did not -- I do not say that.

She talks about solar panels. We invested in a solar company, our country. That was a disaster. They lost plenty of money on that one. Now look, I’m a great believer in all forms of energy. But we’re putting a lot of people out of work. Our energy policies are disaster. Our country is losing so much in terms of energy, in terms of paying off our debt.  You can't do what you're looking to do with twenty trillion in debt. The Obama administration from the time they’ve come in is over 230 years worth of debt. And he’s topped it. He’s doubled it in a course of almost eight years -- seven and a half years to be semi- exact. So I will tell you this, we have to do a much better job at keeping our jobs and we have to do a much better job at giving companies incentive to build new companies or to expand. Because they’re not doing it. And all you have to do is look at Michigan and all you have to do is look at Ohio and look at all of these places where so many of their jobs and their companies are just leaving. They’re gone. And Hillary, I’ll just ask you this -- you've been doing this for thirty years. Why are you just thinking about these solutions right now? For thirty years, you’ve been doing it. And now you're just starting to think of solutions.

Excuse me. I will bring back jobs. You can't bring back jobs.

Yeah for thirty years.

Well, he approved NAFTA. He approved NAFTA, which is the single worst trade deal ever approved in this country.

But you haven’t done it in thirty years or 26 years.

You haven’t done it.

Your husband signed NAFTA, one of the worst thing that ever happened in the manufacturing industry.

You go to New England. You go to Ohio, Pennsylvania. You go anywhere you want, Secretary Clinton, and you will see devastation where manufacturing is down thirty, forty, sometimes fifty percent -- NAFTA is the worst trade deal maybe ever signed anywhere but certainly ever signed in  this country. And now you want to approve Trans-Pacific Partnership. You were totally in favor of it, then you heard what I was saying - how bad it is - and you said, I can’t win that debate. But you know that if you did win, you would approve that, and that will be almost as bad as NAFTA. Nothing will ever top NAFTA.

You called it the gold standard. You call it the gold standard of trade deals.

You said it’s the finest deal you’ve ever seen.

And then you heard what I said about it and all of a sudden you were against it.

So is it President Obama’s fault?

Secretary, is it President Obama’s fault?

Because he’s pushing it.

But you have no plan.

Secretary, you have no plan.

You are going to approve one of the biggest tax cuts in history - you are going to approve one of the biggest tax increases in history. You are going to drive business out. Your regulations are disaster, and you’re going to increase regulations all over the place. And by the way, my tax cut is the biggest since Ronald Reagan. I’m very proud of it.  It will create tremendous numbers of new jobs. But regulations -- you are going to regulate these businesses out of existence. When I go around, Lester, I tell you this -- I’ve been all over. And when I go around, despite the tax cut -- the things that businesses and people like the most, is the fact that I'm cutting regulation. You have regulations on top of regulations and new companies cannot form. And old companies are going out of business, and you want to increase the regulation and make them even worse. I'm going to cut regulations. But I’m going to cut taxes big league and you’re going to raise taxes big league. End of story.

Facts.

And take a look at mine also and you’ll see..

Could I just finish? I think I should - you go to her website, she’s going to raise taxes 1.3 trillion dollars and look at her website. You know what, it’s no different than this. She’s telling us how to fight ISIS. Just go to her website. She tells you how to fight ISIS on her website. I don’t think General Douglas MacArthur would like that too much.

No, no. You’re telling the enemy everything you want to do.

No wonder you’ve been fighting ISIS your entire adult life.

Well, I’m really calling for major jobs because the wealthy are going to create tremendous jobs. They’re going to expand their companies. They’re going to do a tremendous job.  I’m getting rid of the carried interest provision. And if you really look, it’s not a great thing for the wealthy. It’s a great thing for a middle-class. It’s a great thing for companies to expand. And when these people are going to put billions and billions of dollars into companies and when they’re going to bring two and a half trillion dollars back from overseas, where they can’t bring the money back because politicians like Secretary Clinton won’t allow them to bring it back because the taxes are so onerous and the bureaucratic red tape. So bad. So what they're doing is they're leaving our country and they’re, believe it or not, leaving because taxes are too high and because some of them have lots of money outside of our country. And instead of bringing it back and putting the money to work because they can't work out a deal to -- and everybody agrees it should be brought back. Instead of that, they’re leaving our country to get their money because they can't bring their money back into our country because of bureaucratic red tape, because they can't get together. Because we have a president that can't sit them around a table and get them to approve something. And here's the thing -- Republicans and Democrats agree that this should be done. Two and a half trillion - I happen to think it’s double that - it’s probably five trillion dollars that we can't bring into our country, Lester. And with a little leadership, you’d get it in here very quickly. To be put to use on the inner cities and lots of other things, and it would be beautiful. But we have no leadership. And honestly, that starts with Secretary Clinton.

Why not?

There's nothing crazy about not letting our companies bring their money back into their country.

Then you didn’t read it.

Who gave it that name?

is what we need in America not more advantages for people at the very top.

Typical politician. All talk no action. Sounds good. Doesn't work. Never going to happen. Our country is suffering because people like Secretary Clinton have made such bad decisions in terms of our jobs and in terms of what is going on. Now look, we have the worst revival of an economy since the Great Depression. And believe me, we are in a bubble right now. And the other leaving that looks good is the stock market. But if you raise interest rates even a little bit that is going to come crashing down.  We are in a big fat ugly bubble. And we better be awfully careful. And we had a Fed that is doing political things. This Janet Yellen of the Fed, the Fed is doing political by keeping interest rates at this level. And believe me the day Obama goes off and he leaves and he goes out to the golf course for the rest of his life to play golf, when they raise interest rates, you are going to see some very bad things happen because the Fed is not doing their job. The Fed is being more political than Secretary Clinton.

I don't mind releasing. I’m under a routine audit. And it will be released. And as soon as the audit’s finished, it will be released. But you will learn more about Donald Trump by going down to the federal elections where I filed a one hundred and four page, essentially financial statement of sorts, the forms that they have. It shows income, in fact the income -- I just looked today, the income is filed at six hundred ninety four million dollars for this past year. Six hundred ninety four million. If you would have told me I would make that fifteen or twenty years ago, I would have been very surprised. But that’s the kind of thinking that our country needs. When we have a country that is doing so badly that is being ripped off by every single country in the world, it is the kind of thinking that our country needs because everybody -- Lester, we have a trade deficit with all of the countries that we do business with of almost eight hundred billion dollars a year.  You know that is? That means who is negotiating these trade deals? We have people that are political hacks negotiating our trade deals.

Well, I told you I will release them as soon as the audit. Look, I have been under audit almost for fifteen years. I know a lot of wealthy people that have never been audited. I said do you get audited? I get audited almost every year. And in a way I should be complaining. I’m not even complaining. I don't mind them. It’s almost become a way of life. I get audited by the IRS. But other people don't. I will say this. We have a situation in this country that has to be taken care of. I will release my tax returns against my lawyer's wishes when she releases her thirty three thousand e-mails that have been deleted. As soon as she releases them, I will release, I will release my tax returns. And that is against, my lawyers, they say don’t do it. I will tell you this -- in fact watching shows, reading the papers. Almost every lawyer says you don't release your return until the audit is complete. When the audit is complete I will do it. But I would go against them if she releases her emails.

It's not negotiable. No, let her release her emails. Why did she delete 33,000 emails?

That makes me smart.

That's for sure.

That was more than a mistake. That was done purposely. That was not a mistake. That was done purposely. When you have your staff taking the Fifth Amendment, taking the fifth so they are not prosecuted,  when you have the man that set up the illegal server taking the fifth, I think it’s disgraceful. And believe me, this country thinks it is this -- really thinks it is disgraceful also. As far as my tax returns, you do not earn that much from tax returns. That I can tell you. You learn a lot from financial disclosure. And you should go down and take a look at that. The other thing - I am incredibly the underleveraged. The report that six hundred feet fifty -- which by the way, a lot of friends of mine that know my business say boy that's really not a lot of money. That's not a lot of money relative to what I had. The big buildings that were in question they said in the same report, which actually wasn’t even a bad story, to be honest with you -- but the buildings are worth 3.9 billion dollars. And the six hundred fifty is not even on that. But it is not six hundred fifty. It is much less than that. But I could give you a list of banks. If that would help you I would give you list the banks. These are very fine institutions, very fine banks. I could do that very quickly. I am very underleveraged. I have a great company. I have it tremendous income. And the reason I say it is not a braggadocios way. It’s because it is about time that this country had somebody running it that has an idea about money. When we had twenty twelve trillion dollars in debt in our country is a mess -- you know is one thing to have twenty trillion debt and our roads are good and our bridges are good everything is in great shape. Our airports are like from a Third World country. You land at LaGuardia, you land at Kennedy, you land at LAX, you land at Newark and you come in from Dubai and Qatar and you see these incredible -- you come in from China -- you see these incredible airports and you land... we become a Third World country. So the worst of all things has happened. We owe twenty trillion dollars and we are a mess. We haven’t even started. And we have spent $6 trillion dollars in the Middle East according to a report that I just saw. Whether it is six or five but it looks like it is six -- six trillion dollars in the Middle East. We could've rebuilt our country twice. And it's really a shame. And it’s politicians like Secretary Clinton that have caused this problem. Our country has tremendous problems. We are a debtor nation. We’re a serious debtor nation. And we have a country that needs new roads, new tunnels, new bridges, new airports, new schools, new hospitals and we don't have the money because it has been squandered on so many of your ideas.

It would be squandered too, believe me.  

Maybe you can do a good job and I was unsatisfied with his work. Which our country should do too.

Wrong.

Look it's all words. It's all soundbites. I built an unbelievable company, some of the greatest assets anywhere in the world, real estate assets anywhere in the world, beyond the United States. In Europe, lots of different places. It's an unbelievable company. But on occasion, four times, we used certain laws that are there. And when Secretary Clinton talks about people that didn’t get paid, first of all they did get paid a lot but taken advantage of the laws of the nation. Now, if you want to change the laws, you've been a long time, change the laws. But I take advantage of the laws of the nation because I am running the company. My obligation right now is to do well for myself, my family, my employees, for my companies. And that is what I do. But what she does not say is that tens of thousands of people that are unbelievably happy and that love me -- I’ll give you an example. We’re just opening up on Pennsylvania Avenue right next to the White House, so if I don't get there one way, I'm going to get Pennsylvania Avenue another. But we are opening the old post office. Under budget, ahead of schedule, save tremendous money, I’m a year ahead of schedule. And that is what this country should be doing. We build roads and they cost two and three and four times what they’re supposed to cost. We buy products for our military and they come at a cost that are so far above what they are supposed to be because we don't have people that know what they are doing. When we look at the budget, the budget is bad to large extent because we have people that have no idea as to what to do and how to buy. The Trump International is way under budget and way ahead of schedule. And we should be able to do that for our country.

Well, first of all Secretary Clinton doesn't want to use a couple of words and that’s law and order. And we need law and order. If we don't have it, we’re not going to have a country. And when I look at what's going on in Charlotte, the city I love, the city where I have investments, when I look at what's going on throughout various parts of our country, whether it's...I can keep naming them all day long -- we need law and order in our country. And I just got today the as you know the endorsement of the fraternal order of police which just came in. We have endorsements from I think almost every police group, I mean a large percentage of them in United States. We have a situation where we have our inner cities, African-American, Hispanics, are living in hell because it's so dangerous. You walk down the street, you get shot. In Chicago, they’ve had thousands of shootings, thousands, since January first. Thousands of shootings. And I’m saying where is this? Is this war-torn country? What are we doing? And we had to stop the violence. We have to bring back law in order.  In a place like Chicago, where thousands of people have been killed, thousands over the last number of years, in fact almost four thousand having killed since Barack Obama became president. Over four, almost four thousand people in Chicago have been killed. We have to bring back law and order. Now, whether or not in a place like Chicago, you do stop and frisk which worked very well Mayor Giuliani is here worked very well in New York. It brought the crime rate way down but you take the gun away from criminals that should be having it. We have gangs roaming the street and in many cases they’re illegally here, illegal immigrants. And they have guns and they shoot people. And we have to be very strong and we have to be very vigilant. We have to be we had to know what we’re doing. Right now our police, in many cases, are afraid to do anything. We have to protect our inner cities because African-American communities are being decimated by crime.

No,  you're wrong. It went before a judge who was a very against police judge. It was taken away from her and our mayor, our new mayor, refused to go forward with the case. They would have won an appeal. If you look at it throughout the country, there are many places where...

No, the argument is that we had to take the guns away from these people that have them and that are bad people that shouldn't have them. These are felons and these are people that are bad people that shouldn't be...when you have three thousand shootings in Chicago from January 1st, when you have four thousand people killed in Chicago by guns from the beginning of the presidency of Barack Obama, his hometown, you have to have stop and frisk. You need more police. You need a better community, you know relation, you don't have a good community relations in Chicago. It's terrible. I have property there. It’s terrible what’s going on in Chicago. But when you look -- and Chicago’s not the only one. You go to Ferguson, you go to so many different places. You need better relationships, I agree with Secretary Clinton on this, you need better relationships between communities in the police because in some cases it's not good but you look at Dallas where the relationships were really studied the relationships were really a beautiful thing. And then five police officers were killed. One night very violently. So there's some bad things going on, some really bad things.

But Lester we need law and order and we need law and order in the inner cities because the people that are most affected by what's happening are African-American and Hispanic people and it's very unfair to them what our politicians are allowing to happen.

Ugh.

DONALD TRUMP	I'd like to respond.

First of all, I agree and a lot of people even within my own party want to give certain rights to people on watch lists and no-fly lists. I agree with you when a person is on a watch list or a no-fly list, and I have the endorsement of the NRA which I'm very proud of, these are very, very good people and they’re protecting the Second Amendment, but I think we have to look very strongly at no-fly lists and watchlists and when people are on there, even if they shouldn’t be on there, we’ll help them, we’ll help them legally, we will help them get off. But I tend to agree with that. Quite strongly. I do want to bring up the fact that you were the one that brought up the word super predator about young black youth. And that's a term that I think was that's been horribly met as you know. I think you've apologized for it. But I think it was a terrible thing to say. And when it comes to stop and frisk, you know, you're talking about taking the guns away. Well, I'm talking about taking guns away from gangs and people that use them. And I don't think, I really don't think you disagree with me on this, if you want to know the truth. I think maybe there's a political reason why you can't say it, but I really don't believe. In New York City, stop and risk, we had 2,200 murders and stop and frisk brought it down to 500 murders. Five hundred murders is a lot of murders. Hard to believe 500 is like supposed to be good? But we went from 2,200 to 500 and it was continued on by Mayor Bloomberg. And it was terminated by our current mayor. But stop and frisk had a tremendous impact on the safety of New York City, tremendous beyond belief, so when you say it has no impact, it really did. It had a very big impact.

You're wrong.

Murders murders are up.

True.

But I’d like to just respond if I might?

The African American community has been let down by our politicians. They talk good around election time, like right now, and after the election they said see you later, I'll see you in four years. The African-American- look the community within the inner cities has been so badly treated, they been abused and used in order to get votes by Democrat politicians because that's what it is. They’ve controlled these communities for up to a hundred years.

And I will tell you, you look at the inner cities, and I just left Detroit and I just left Philadelphia and I just you know you’ve see me I been all over the place, you decided to stay home, and that's OK. But I will tell you I've been all over, and I've met some of the greatest people I’ll ever meet within these communities. And they are very, very upset with what their politicians have told them and what their politicians have done.

I’ll tell you- it’s very simple to say. Sidney Blumenthal works for the campaign and a very close friend of Secretary Clinton. And her campaign manager Patti Doyle went to, during her campaign against President Obama, fought very hard, and you can go look it up, and you can check it out, and if you look at CNN this past week Patti Solis Doyle was on Wolf Blitzer saying that this happened. Blumenthal sent McClatchy, a highly-respected reporter at McClatchy to Kenya to find out about it.  They were pressing it very hard, she failed to get the birth certificate. When I got involved, I didn't fail. I got him to give the birth certificate. So I'm satisfied with it, and I’ll tell you why I’m satisfied with it.

Because I want to get on to defeating ISIS. Because I want to get on to creating jobs. Because I want to get on to having a strong border. Because I want to get on the things that are very important to me and that are very important to the country.

Well, nobody was pressing it. Nobody was caring much about it. I figured you’d ask the question tonight, of course. But nobody was caring much about it. But I was the one that got him to produce the birth certificate. And I think I did a good job. Secretary Clinton also fought it. I mean, you know, now everybody in the mainstream’s gonna say, that’s not true. Look, it’s true. Sidney Blumenthal sent a reporter. You just have to take a look at CNN last week, the interview with your former campaign manager. And she was involved. But just like she can't bring back jobs, she can't produce.

I say nothing because I was able to get him to produce it. He should have produced a long time before. I say nothing, but let me just tell you. When you talk about healing, I think that I developed very, very good relationships over the last little while with the African-American community. I think you can see that. And I feel that they really wanted me to come to that conclusion. And I think I did a great job and a great service, not only for the country but even for the president in getting him to produce his birth certificate.

I would love to respond. First of all, I got to watch, in preparing for this, some of your debates against Barack Obama. You treated him with terrible disrespect. And I watch the way you talk now about how lovely everything is and how wonderful you are. Doesn’t work that way. You are after him. You were trying to -- you even sent out, or your campaign sent out, pictures of him in a certain garb, very famous pictures. I don’t think you can deny that. But just last week, your campaign manager said it was true. So when you try to act holier than thou, it really doesn't work. It really doesn't.

 Now as far as the lawsuit, yes, when I was very young, I went to my father's company. Had a real estate company in Brooklyn and Queens. And we, along with many, many other companies throughout the country, a federal lawsuit, were sued. We settled the suit with zero -- with no admission of guilt. It was very easy to do. But they sued many people. I notice you bring that up a lot, and, you know, I also noticed the very nasty commercials that you do on me in so many different ways, which I don’t do on you. Maybe I’m trying to save the money. But frankly, I look at that, and I say -- isn’t that amazing? Because I settled that lawsuit with no admission of guilt. But that was a lawsuit brought against many real estate firms. And it’s just one of those things. I'll go on one step further. In Palm Beach, Florida -- tough community -- a brilliant community, a wealthy community, probably the wealthiest community there is in the world, I opened a club. And really got great credit for it. No discrimination against African-Americans, against Muslims, against anybody. And it's a tremendously successful club. And I'm so glad I did it. And I have been given great credit for what I did. And I'm very, very proud of it. And that's the way I feel. That is the true way I feel.

I do want to say that I was just endorsed and more are coming next week, it’ll be over two hundred admirals, many of them are here, admirals and generals endorsed me to leave this country. That just happened and many more are coming. And I'm very proud of it. In addition, I was is endorsed by ICE. They’ve never endorsed anybody before -- on immigration. I was just endorsed by ICE. I was just recently endorsed...16,500 border patrol agencies. So when Secretary Clinton talks about this, I mean, I'll take the admirals and I’ll take the generals any day over the political hacks that I see who have led our country so brilliantly over the last ten years with their knowledge because look at the mess that were in. Look at the mess that were in. As far as the cyber, I agree to parts of what Secretary Clinton said. We should be better than anybody else and perhaps we’re not. I don’t think anybody knows that it was Russia that broke into the DNC. She saying Russia, Russia, Russia. I don't -- maybe it was. I mean, it could be Russia, but it could also be China, it could also be lots of other people. It also could be somebody sitting on their bed who weighs 400 pounds, ok? You don’t know how broke into DNC? But what did we learn with DNC? We learn that Bernie Sanders was taken advantage of by your people, by Debbie Wasserman Schultz. Look what happened to her. But Bernie Sanders was taken advantage of. That’s what it was. Now, whether that was Russia, whether that was China, whether it was another country, we don't know because the truth is under President Obama, we've lost control of things that we used to have control over. We came in with the Internet. We came up with the Internet. And I think Secretary Clinton and myself would agree very much when you look at what ISIS is doing with the Internet, they’re beating us at our own game. ISIS. So we had to get very very tough on cyber and cyber warfare. It is a huge problem. I have a son -- he’s ten years old. He has computers. He is so good with these computers. It’s unbelievable. The security aspect of cyber is very, very tough. And maybe, it's hardly doable. But I will say, we are not doing the job we should be doing. But that’s true throughout our whole governmental society. We have so many things that we have to do better, Lester. And certainly cyber is one of them.

Well, first I have to say one thing -- very important. Secretary Clinton is talking about taking out ISIS. We will take out ISIS. Well, President Obama and Secretary Clinton created a vacuum the way they got out of Iraq because they got out -- they shouldn’t have been in but once they got in, the way they got out was a disaster. And ISIS was formed. So she talks about taking them out. She’s been doing it a long time. She’s been trying to take them out for a long time. But they wouldn't have even been formed if they left some troops behind, like ten thousand or maybe something more than that. And then you wouldn’t have had them. Or, as I’ve been saying for a long time, and I think you’ll agree because I said it to you once-- had we taken the oil -- and we should have taken the oil, ISIS would not have been able to form either because the oil was their primary source of income. And now they have the oil all over the place including the oil, a lot of the oil in Libya, which was another one of her disasters.

Wrong.

Wrong.

Well, I have to respond.

The secretary said very strongly about working with -- we’ve working with them for many years and we have the greatest mess anyone has ever seen. You look at the Middle East. It’s a total mess. Under your direction to a large extent. But you look at the Middle East. You started the Iran deal, that’s another beauty, where you have a country that was ready to fall, I mean they were doing so badly, they were choking on the sanctions. And now they’re going to be actually probably be a major power at some point pretty soon the way they are going. But when you look at NATO, I was asked on a major show, what do you think of NATO? Now you have to understand, I’m a businessperson. I did really well. But I have common sense. And I said, well, I’ll tell you. I haven’t given lots of thought to NATO. But two things -- but number one the 28 countries of NATO many of them aren’t paying their fair share. Number two...and that bothers me, because we should be asked where defending them -- they should be at least be paying us what they are supposed to be paying by treaty and contract. Number two, I said the very strongly, NATO can be obsolete because, and I was very strong on this and was actually covered very accurately New York Times - which is unusual for the New York Times to be honest -- but I said they do not focus on terror. And I was very strong. And I said it numerous times. And about four months ago I read on the front page of the Wall Street Journal that NATO is opening of major terror division. And I think that's great. And I think we should get, because we pay approximately seventy three percent of the cost of NATO-- a lot of money -- to protect other people -- but I’m am all for NATO. But I said they have to focus on terror also. And they are going to do that. And I was -- really I'm not going to get credit for it because largely because of what I was saying in my criticism of NATO. I think we have to get NATO to go into the Middle East with us in addition to surrounding nations we have to knock the hell out of ISIS. And we have to do it fast. When ISIS formed in this vacuum created by Barack Obama and Secretary Clinton and believe me you were the ones that took out the troops, not only that, you named the day. They couldn’t believe it. They sat back probably said...When they formed this is something that never should have happened. It should have never happened. Now you’re talking about taking out ISIS. But you were there and you were Secretary of State when it was a little infant. Now it is in over thirty countries and you are going to stop them? I don't think so.

I did not support the war in Iraq.  That is a mainstream media nonsense put out by her because she frankly -- I think the best person in her campaign is mainstream media.

I was against the war -- wait a minute, I was against the war in Iraq.

The record shows that I am right. When I did an interview with Howard Stern, very likely first time anyone has asked me that, I said very lightly I don't know maybe who knows. Essentially. I then did an interview with Neil Cavuto. We talked about the economy as more important. I then spoke to Sean Hannity which everyone refuses to call Sean Hannity. I had numerous conversation with Sean Hannity at Fox. And Sean Hannity said, and he called me the other day. And I spoke to him about it. He said you were totally against the war because he was for the war.

Excuse me -- that was before the war started. Sean Hannity said very strongly to me and other people -- he’s willing to say it but nobody wants to call him. I was against the war. He said you used to have fights with me cause Sean was in favor of the war. And I understand that side also-- not very much because we should never have been there -- but nobody called Sean Hannity. And then they did an article in a major magazine shortly after the war started. I think in ‘04. But they did an article which had me totally against the war in Iraq. And one of your compatriots said you know whether it was before or right after Trump was definitely -- because if you read this article there is no doubt. But if somebody and I’ll ask the press, if somebody would call up Sean Hannity, this was before the war started. He and I used to have arguments about the war. I said it's a terrible and a stupid thing. It’s going to destabilize the Middle East. And that is exactly what it has done.

Well, I have much better question judgment than she does. There’s no question about that. I also have a much better temperament that she has, you know? You know, I have a much better -- she spent -- let me tell you. She spent hundreds of millions of dollars on an advertising, you know they get Madison Avenue into a room, oh temperament, let’s go after that…. I think my strongest asset, maybe by far, is my temperament. I have a winning temperament.  I know how to win. She does not know how to win. The AFL-CIO - the other day behind the blue screen, I don't know who you're talking to Secretary Clinton, but you were totally out of control. I said, there is a person with a temperament that’s got a problem.

That would not start a war.

They were taunting us.

Wrong.

That line’s getting a little bit old, I must say.

It's not inaccurate one at all. It’s not an accurate one. So I just want to get a lot of things and just to respond. I agree with her on one thing. The single greatest problem the world has is nuclear armament, nuclear weapons. Not global warming like you think and your president thinks. Nuclear is the single greatest threat. Just to go down the list we defend Japan. We defend Germany. We defend South Korea. We defend Saudi Arabia. We defend countries. They do not pay us what they should be paying us because we are providing tremendous service and were losing a fortune. That's why we’re losing, we’re losing, we lose on everything. I say, who makes these? All I said that it's very possible that if they don't pay a fair share because this isn’t forty years ago where we could do what we’re doing. We can't defend Japan. 

But wait, it's very important. All I said was that they may have to defend themselves or they may have to help us out. For a country that owes twenty trillion dollars, they have to help us out.

As far as the nuclear is concerned, I agree it is the single greatest threat that this country has.

Well, I have to say for what Secretary Clinton was saying about nuclear with Russia, she's very cavalier in the way she talks about various countries. But Russia's been expanding. They have a much newer capability than we do. We have not been updating from the new standpoint I look the other night I was seeing B-52s there old enough that your father, your grandfather could be flying them. We are not we are not keeping up with other countries I would like everybody to end it, just get rid of it but I would certainly not do for a strike. I think that once the nuclear alternative happens, it's over. At the same time we have to be prepared. I can't take anything off the table because you look at some of these countries. You look at North Korea we’re doing nothing there. China should solve the problem for us. China should go into North Korea. China is totally powerful as it relates to North Korea. And by the way, another one powerful is the worst deal I think I’ve ever seen negotiated that you started is the Iran deal. Iran is one of their biggest trading partners. Iran has power over North Korea. And when they made that horrible deal with Iran, they should have included the fact that they do something with respect to North Korea. And they should've done something with respect to Yemen and all these other places and when I asked to Secretary Kerry, why didn’t you do that, why didn’t you add other things into the deal? One of the great giveaways of all time, of all time, including four hundred million dollars in cash nobody’s ever seen that before that turned out to be wrong. It was actually 1.7 billion dollars in cash, obviously I guess for the hostages. It certainly looks that way. So you say to yourself why didn't they make the right deal? This is one of the worst deals ever made by any country in history. The deal with Iran will lead to nuclear problems. All they have to do is sit back ten years and they don't have to do much. And they’re going to end up getting nuclear. I met with Bibi Netanyahu the other day, believe me he is not a happy camper.

Lester, one thing I’d like to say.

I will go very quickly but I will tell you that Hillary will tell you to go to her website and read all about how to defeat ISIS which she could've defeated by never having it get going in the first place. Right now it's getting tougher and tougher to defeat them because they are in more places more and more states more and more nations

And it's a big problem, and is as far Japan is concerned, I want to help all of our allies but we are losing billions and billions of dollars. We cannot be the policeman of the world. We cannot protect countries all over the world.

Where they’re not paying us what we need.

She can't say that because she’s got no business ability. We need heart, we need a lot of things but you need some basic ability. And sadly she doesn't have that. basic ability All of the things that she's talking about could have been taken care of during the last ten years, let’s see, while she had great power. But they weren't taken care of and if she ever wins this race, they won’t be taken care of.

She doesn't have the look. She don't have the stamina. I said she doesn’t have the stamina. And I don't believe she does have the stamina. To be president of this country you need tremendous stamina.

Wait a minute, Lester, you asked me a question. Did you ask me a question? You have to be able to negotiate our trade deals. You have to be able to negotiate, that's right, with Japan with Saudi Arabia. I mean, can you imagine where defending Saudi Arabia and with all of the money they have we’re defending them and they're not paying...all you have to do is to speak to them. What you have so many different things you have to be able to do and I don't believe that Hillary has the stamina.

The world.

Let me tell you, let me tell you. Hillary has experience but it's bad experience. We have made so many bad deals during the last...so she's got experience that I agree but it's bad, bad experience. Whether it’s the Iran deal that you're so in love with where we gave them 150 billion dollars back...whether it’s the Iran deal whether it's anything...you almost can't name a good deal. I agree, she's got experience but it's bad experience. And this country can't afford to have another four years of that kind of experience.

I never said that.

Where did you find it?

Okay, good let me just tell you --

You know Hillary is hitting me with tremendous commercials, some of it’s entertainment, some of it is said somebody's been very vicious to me, Rosie O’Donnell, I said tough things to her and I think everybody would agree that she deserves it and nobody feels sorry for her but you want to know the truth, I was going to say something extremely rough to Hillary, to her family, and I said to myself I can't do it. I just can't do it. It's inappropriate, it's not nice. But she spent hundreds of millions of dollars on negative ads on me many which are absolutely untrue. They’re untrue and they’re misrepresentations. And I will tell you this, Lester, it's not nice and I don't, I don't deserve that. But it's certainly not a nice thing that she’s done. It’s hundreds of millions of ads and the only gratifying thing is I saw the polls come in today and with all of that money, over two hundred millions of spent and I’m either winning or tied.

I want to make America great again. We are a nation that is seriously troubled. We’re losing our jobs, people are pouring into our country. The other day we were deporting eight hundred people and perhaps they passed the wrong button, they pressed the wrong button, or perhaps worse than that it was corruption. But these people that we were going to deport, for good reason, ended up becoming citizens ended up becoming citizens. And it was 800 and now it turns out it might be 1800 and they don’t even know.

I want to make America great again. I’m going to be able to do it. I don't believe Hillary will. The answer is if she wins I will absolutely support her.

---

Well, I actually agree with that. I agree with everything she said. I began this campaign because I was so tired of seeing such foolish things happen to our country. This is a great country. This is a great land. I've gotten to know the people of the country over the last year and a half that I've been doing this as a politician. I cannot believe that I'm saying that about myself, but I guess I have been a politician. And my whole concept was to make America great again. When I watch the deals being made, when I watch what's happening with some horrible things like Obamacare where your health insurance and health care is going up by numbers that are astronomical 68 percent, 59 percent, 71 percent, when I look at the Iran deal and how bad a deal it is for us, it's a one-sided transaction where we’re giving back one hundred fifty billion dollars to a terrorist state, really, the number one terrorist state, we've made them a strong country from really a very weak country just three years ago.

When I look at all of the things that I see and all the potential that our country has, we have such tremendous potential, whether it's in business and trade where we’re doing so badly.

Last year we had an almost 800 billion dollar trade deficit. 

In other words, trading with other countries we had 800 billion dollars deficit, that’s hard to believe. Inconceivable. 

You say who's making these deals? We’re going to make great trade deals, we’re going to have a strong border, we’re going to bring back law and order. Just today policemen were shot - two killed - and this is happening on a weekly basis. We have to bring back respect to law enforcement.

At the same time we have to take care of people on all sides. We need justice. But I want to do things that haven’t been done including fixing and making our interest that is better for the African-American citizens that are so great and for the Latinos, Hispanics, and I look forward to doing it - it’s called make America great again.

No I didn't say that at all.

I don't think you understood what was said. This was locker room talk. I'm not proud of it. I apologized to my family. I apologized to the American people. Certainly I'm not proud of it, but this is locker room talk. You know when we have a world where you have ISIS chopping off heads, where you have men frankly drowning people in steel cages, where you have wars and horrible, horrible sites all over where you have so many bad things happening, this is like medieval times, we haven't seen anything like this -- the carnage all over the world -- and they look and they see. Can you imagine the people that are frankly doing so well against us with ISIS and they look at our country and they see what's going on. Yes, I'm very embarrassed by it. I hate it. But it’s locker room talk and it's one of those things. I will knock the hell out of ISIS, we’re going to defeat ISIS. ISIS happened a number of years ago in a vacuum that was left because of bad judgment and I will tell you I will take care of ISIS.

And we can get onto much more important things and much bigger things.

I have great respect for women. Nobody has more respect for women than I do.

Frankly, you hear these things are said and I was embarrassed by it but I have tremendous respect for women.

And women have respect for me. And I will tell you, no I have not, and I will tell you that I'm going to make our country safe, we’re going to have borders in our country which we don't have now.

People are pouring into our country and they are coming in from the Middle East and other places. We’re going to make America safe again. We’re going to make America great again but we’re going to make America safe again. And we’re going to make America wealthy again because if you don't do that it, just - it sounds harsh to say -  but we have to build up the wealth of. American people.

And we can get onto much more important things a much bigger things.

I have great respect for women. Nobody has more respect for women that I do.

Frankly you hear these things are said and I was embarrassed by it but I have tremendous respect for women.

And women have respect for me and I will tell you know I have not and I will tell you that I'm going to make our country safe we’re going to have borders in our country which we don't have now. People are pouring into our country and are coming in from the Middle East and other places. Were going to make America safe again. Were going to make America great again but we’re going to make America safe again. And we’re going to make America wealthy again because if you don't do that it just it sounds harsh to say but we have to build up the wealth of.

Other nations are taking our jobs and are taking our wealth.

Well am I allowed to respond to that? I assume I am.

It’s just words, folks. It’s just words. And those words I've been hearing them for many years. I heard them when they were running for the Senate in New York where Hillary was going to bring back jobs upstate New York. And she failed. I’ve heard them when Hillary's constantly talking about the inner cities of our country, which are a disaster education-wise, job-wise, safety-wise. In every way possible. I'm going to help the African-Americans. I’m going to help the Latinos, Hispanics. I am going to help the inner cities. She has done a terrible job for the African-Americans. She wants their vote and she does nothing and then she comes back four years later. We saw that firsthand when she was a United States senator. She campaigned where the primary part of her campaign-

So, she’s allowed to do that but I'm not allowed to respond. Sounds fair, sounds fair--

That was locker room talk, as I told you. That was locker room talk. I'm not proud of it. I am a person who has great respect for people, for my family, for the people of this country. And certainly, I’m not proud of it. But that was something that happened. If you look at Bill Clinton, far worse -- mine are words, and his was action. His was far worse -- what he’s done to women, there’s never been anyone in the history of politics in this nation who has been so abusive to women. So you could say anyway you want to say it, but Bill Clinton was abusive to women. Hillary Clinton attacked those same women and attacked them viciously. 

Four of them here tonight. One of the women, who was a wonderful woman, 12 years old, was raped -- at twelve. Her client -- she represented, got him off. And she’s seen laughing on two separate occasions, laughing at the girl who was raped. Kathy Shelton, that young woman is here with us tonight.

So don't tell me about words. I am absolutely - I apologize for those words. But it is things that people say. But what President Clinton did -- he was impeached. He lost his license to practice law. He had to pay an $850,000 fine to one of the women, Paula Jones, who is also here tonight.

And I will tell you that when Hillary brings up a point like that and she talks about words that I said eleven years ago, I think it's disgraceful. And I think she should be ashamed of herself, if you want to know the truth.

Well, you owe the president an apology because, as you know very well, your campaign, Sidney Blumenthal, he's another real winner that you have. And he's the one that got this started along with your campaign manager and they were on television just two weeks ago he was saying exactly that.

The you really owe him. Or the one who sent the picture to run your campaign -- the pictures around President Obama in a certain garb. That was long before I was ever involved, so you actually owe an apology. Number two, Michelle Obama -- I've gotten to see the commercials that they did on you. And I’ve gotten to see some of the most vicious commercials I’ve ever seen of Michelle Obama talking about you, Hillary. So you talk about friend, go back and take a look at those commercials. A race where you lost fair and square, unlike the Bernie Sanders race where you won, but not fair and square, in my opinion. And all you have to do is take a look at WikiLeaks and just see what they said about Bernie Sanders and see what Debra Wasserman Schultz had in mind because Bernie Sanders, between superdelegates and Debra Wasserman Schultz, he never had a chance. I was so surprised to see him sign on with the devil. But when you talk about apology,I think the one that you should really be apologizing for -- and the thing that you should be apologizing for are the thirty three thousand e-mails that you deleted and that you acid washed and then the two boxes of e-mails and other things last week that were taken from an office and are now missing. And I'll tell you what, I didn’t think I'd say this, but I’m going to say it, and I hate to say it. But if I win, I am going to instruct my Attorney General to get a special prosecutor to look into your situation because there has never been so many lies, so much deception. There has never been anything like it. And we're going to have a special prosecutor.

When I speak, I go out and speak, the people of this country are furious. In my opinion, the people that have been long-term workers at the FBI are furious. There has never been anything like this where e-mails and you get a subpoena -- you get a subpoena and after getting the subpoena, you delete 33,000 e-mails. And then you acid wash them or bleach them, as you would say-- a very expensive process. So we're going to get a special prosecutor, and we’re going to look into it. Because you know what? People have been -- their lives have been destroyed for doing one fifth of what you’ve done. And it’s a disgrace. And honestly, you ought to be ashamed of yourself.

Because you'd be in jail.

And yet she didn't know the letter “C” on a document. Right? She didn't even know what that word -- what that letter meant. You know, it's amazing. I'm watching Hillary go over facts. And she’s going after fact after fact. And she's lying again. Because she said she you know, what she did with the e-mails was fine. You think it was fine to delete 33,000 e-mails? I don't think so. She said that 33,000 e-mails had to do with her daughter's wedding, number one, and a yoga class. Well maybe we’ll give three or three or four or five or something. Thirty three thousand e-mails deleted, and now she is saying there wasn't anything wrong. And more importantly, that was after getting the subpoena. That wasn’t before that was after she got it from the United States Congress. And I’ll be honest. I am so disappointed in Congressmen, including Republicans, for allowing this to happen. Our Justice Department, where her husband goes to the back of an airplane for 30 minutes, talks to the Attorney General days before a ruling on her case…

But for you to say, that there is nothing wrong with you deleting  thirty nine thousand e-mails, again, you should be ashamed of yourself. What you did, and this is after getting a subpoena from the United States Congress.

Let alone after getting the subpoena from the United States Congress.

What about the other fifteen thousand?

That’s because you have nothing to say.

And get off this question.

I'd like to know Anderson, why aren’t you bringing up the emails? I’d like to know. It hasn’t been finished at all.

It's nice - it's one on three.

No, I’m a gentleman. Hillary, go ahead.

It is such a great question, and it's maybe the question I get almost more than anything else. Outside of defense. Obamacare is a disaster. You know it, we all know it. It is going up at numbers that nobody has ever seen worldwide. Nobody has ever seen numbers like this for health care. It is only getting worse. In seventeen, it implodes by itself.

Their method of fixing it is to go back and ask Congress for more money. More and more money. We have right now have almost twenty trillion dollars in debt. Obamacare will never work. It is very bad, very bad health insurance. Far too expensive, and not only expensive for the person that has it, unbelievably expensive for our country. It's going to be one of the biggest line items, very shortly.

We have to repeal it, and replace it with something absolutely much less expensive. And something that works. Where your plan can actually be tailored. We have to get rid of the lines around the state, artificial lines. Where we stop insurance companies from coming in and competing because they wanted President Obama and whoever was working on it. They want to leave those lines because that gives the insurance companies, essentially, monopolies.

We want competition. You will have the finest health care plan there is. She wants to go to a single-payer plan, which would be a disaster. Somewhat similar to Canada. And if you haven't noticed the Canadians, when they need a big operation, they come into the United States, in many cases. Because their system is so slow, it is catastrophic in certain ways. But she wants to go to single-payer.

Which means the government basically rules everything. Hillary Clinton has been after this for years. Obamacare was the first step. Obamacare is a total disaster. And not only are your rates going up by numbers that no one has ever believed, but your deductibles are going up. So that unless you get hit by a truck, you are never going to be able to use it. It is a disastrous plan and it has to be repealed and replaced.

Just one thing. First of all Hillary, everything is broken about it. Everything. Number two, Bernie Sanders said that Hillary Clinton has very bad judgment. This is a perfect example of it. Trying to save Obamacare which is -

Well, I'll tell you what it means. You’re going to have plans that are so good. Because we are going to have so much competition in the insurance industry, once we break out the lines and allow the competition to come.

Anderson, excuse me. President Obama, by keeping those lines, the boundary lines around each state, and it was almost gone until just very toward the end of the passage of Obamacare, which by the way was a fraud. You know that. Because Jonathan Gruber, the architect of Obamacare has said, he said it was a great lie was a big lie. President Obama said you keep your doctor,  you keep your plan. The whole thing was a fraud. And it doesn't work.

But when we get rid of those lines you will have competition. 

And we will be able to keep pre-existing. We’ll also be able to help people who can't get, don't have money. Because we are going to have people protected. And Republicans feel this way, believe it or not, and strongly this way. We are going to block grant into the state. We are going to block grant into Medicaid.

Into the states so that will be able to take care of people without the necessary funds to take care of themselves.

Well, you're right about Islamophobia, and that's a shame. But one thing we have to do is we have to make sure that because there is a problem. I mean whether we like it or not we can be very politically correct, but whether we like it or not there is a problem and we have to be sure that Muslims come in and report when they see something going on when they see hatred going on they have report it. As an example, in San Bernardino, many people saw the bombs all over the apartment of the two people that killed fourteen and wounded many many people. Horribly wounded; they’ll never be the same.

Muslims have to report the problems when they see them. And you know there's always a reason for everything. If they don't do that, it's a very difficult situation for our country. Because you look at Orlando, and you look at San Bernardino, and you look at the World Trade Center go outside, you look at Paris look at the horrible - these are radical Islamic terrorists and she won't even mention the word and nor will President Obama. He will use the term radical Islamic terrorism. Now to solve a problem, you have to be able to state what the problem is or at least say the name. She won't say the name and President Obama won't say the name, but the name is there. It’s radical Islamic terror. And before you solve it, you have to say the name.

First of all, Captain Khan is an American hero. And if I were president at that time, he would be alive today, because unlike her, who voted for the war without knowing what she was doing, I would not have had our people in Iraq. Iraq was a disaster. So he would have been alive today. The Muslim ban is something that in some form has morphed into an extreme vetting from certain areas of the world. Hillary Clinton wants to allow hundreds of thousands --  

Why don’t you interrupt her?

It's called extreme vetting. We are going to areas like Syria, where they're coming in by the tens of thousands because of Barack Obama and Hillary Clinton wants to allow a 550% increase over Obama. People are coming into our country, like we have no idea who they are, where they're from, what their feelings about our country is, and she wants 550% more. This is going to be the great Trojan horse of all time.

We have enough problems in this country. I believe in building safe zones. I believe in having other people pay for them, as an example, the Gulf States who are not carrying their weight, but they have nothing but money. And take care of people. But I don't want to have with all the problems this country has and all of the problems that you see going on hundreds of thousands of people coming in from Syria when we know nothing about them, we know nothing about their values, and we know nothing about their love for our country.

It has not been debunked.

I was against the war in Iraq

It has not been debunked. And you voted for it and you shouldn't have. Well I just want to say.

Excuse me. She just went about twenty five seconds over her time.

Can I just respond to this please?

Hillary Clinton, in terms of having people coming to our country, we have many criminal illegal aliens. When we want to send them back to their country their country says we don't want them in some cases they’re murderers, drug lords, drug problems. And they don't want them. And Hillary Clinton when she was Secretary of State said that's okay. We can't force it into their country.

Let me tell you I'm going to force them right back into the country. They’re murderers and some very bad people and I will tell you, I'm very strongly, when Bernie Sanders said she had bad judgment, she has really bad judgment because we are letting people into this country that are going to cause problems and crime like you've never seen. We’re also leading drugs pour through our southern border at a record clip. At a record clip and it shouldn't be allowed to happen.

ICE just endorsed me. They've never endorsed a presidential candidate.

The border patrol agents, sixteen thousand five hundred just recently endorsed me. And they endorsed me because I understand the border. She doesn't. She wants amnesty for everybody, Come right in come right over.

It’s a horrible thing she's doing. She's got bad judgment and honestly so bad that she should never be president of the United States. That I can tell you.

Well, I think I should respond because, so ridiculous. Look, now she's blaming - she got caught in a total lie her papers went out to all her friends at the banks, Goldman Sachs and everybody else, and she said things, WikiLeaks that just came out and she lied.

Now she's blaming the lie on the late great Abraham Lincoln. That's one that I haven’t - okay Honest Abe never lied. That’s the good thing that's a big difference between Abraham Lincoln and you. That's a big big difference, we're talking about some difference. But as far as other elements of what she was saying I don't know Putin. I think would be great if we got along with Russia because we could fight ISIS together as an example. But I don't know Putin. But I notice anytime anything wrong happens they like to say the Russians we don't know if it's Russian.

She doesn’t know if it’s the Russians doing the hacking, maybe there is no hacking. But they always blame Russia and the reason they blame Russia because they think they are trying to tarnish me with Russia. I know nothing about Russia. I know, I know about Russia but I know nothing about the inner workings of Russia.

I don't deal there, I have no businesses there have no loans from Russia.

Have a very very great balance sheet, so great that when I did the old post office on Pennsylvania Avenue, the United States government, because of my balance sheet, which they actually know very well, chose me to do the old post office between the White House and Congress, chose me to do the old post office, one of the primary things in fact perhaps the primary thing was balance sheet.

But I have no loans with Russia. You could go to the United States government and they would probably tell you that because they know my sheet very well in order to get that development I had to have -- now the taxes are very simple thing. As soon as -- first of all, I pay hundred of millions of dollars in taxes. Many of her friends took bigger deductions. Warren Buffett took a massive deduction. Soros, who is a friend of hers, took a massive deduction. Many of the people that are giving her all this money that she could do many more commercials than me gave her took massive deductions. I pay hundreds of millions of dollars in taxes but but as soon as my routine audit is finished, I'll release my returns I'll be very proud to. They’re actually quite good.

Well, one thing I’d do is get rid of carried interest. One of the greatest provisions, for people like me, to be honest with you -- I give up a lot when I run because I knock out the tax code. And she could have done this years ago, by the way. She’s a United States -- she was a United States senator. She complains that Donald Trump took advantage of the tax cut. Well, why didn't she change it? Why didn’t you change it when you were Senator? The reason you didn’t that all your friends take the same advantage that I do. But I do.

You have provisions in the tax code that, frankly, we could change. But you wouldn't change it because all of these people give you the money so you can take negative ads on Donald Trump. But -- and I say that about a lot of things. You know, I've heard Hillary complain about so many different things over the years -- she’s been doing this stuff -- but she's been there for thirty years she’s been doing this stuff. And she never will change. She never will change. And she never will change.

We’re getting rid of carried interest provisions. I'm lowering taxes actually because I think it's so important for corporations because we have corporations leaving -- massive corporations and little ones -- little ones can’t form. We’re getting rid of regulations which goes hand in hand with the lowering of the taxes. But we're bringing the tax rate down from thirty five percent to fifteen percent. We’re cutting taxes for the middle class, and I will tell you, we are cutting them big league for the middle class. And I will tell you Hillary Clinton is raising your taxes, folks. 

You can look at me -- she is raising your taxes really high. And what that's going to do is a disaster for the country. But she is raising your taxes, and I'm lowering your taxes. That in itself is a big difference. We are going to be thriving again. We have no growth in this country. There is no growth. 

If China has a GDP of seven percent, it’s like a national catastrophe. We’re down at one percent, and that’s like no growth. And we're going lower, in my opinion. And a lot of it has to do with the fact that our taxes are so high. Just about the highest in the world. And I'm bringing them down to one of the lower in the world. And I think it's so important, one of the most important things we can do. But she is raising everybody's taxes massively.

Of course I do. Of course I do. And so do all of her donors, or most of her donors. I know many of her donors. Her donors took massive tax write-offs. A lot of my write-off was depreciation and other things that Hillary, as a Senator, allowed. And she’ll always allow it because the people that give her all this money, they want it. That's why. See, I understand the tax code better than anybody that’s ever run for president. 

Hillary Clinton -- and it’s extremely complex -- Hillary Clinton has friends that want all of these provisions, including they want the carried interest provision, which is very important to Wall Street people. But they really want the carried interest provision, which I believe Hillary is leaving.

And very interesting why she’s leaving carried interests, but I will tell you that number one I pay tremendous numbers of taxes. I absolutely use it, and so did Warren Buffett. And so did George Soros and so did many of the other people that Hillary is getting money from. Now I won't mention their names because they're rich, but they’re not famous. So we won't make them famous.

No. But I pay tax, and I pay federal tax too. But I have a write-off. A lot of it is depreciation, which is a wonderful charge. I love depreciation. You know, she’s given it to us.

Hey, if she had a problem -- for thirty years, she’s been doing this Anderson. I say it all the time. She talks about healthcare. Why didn’t she do something about it? She talks about taxes. Why didn't she do something about it? She doesn't do anything about anything other than talk. With her, it's all talk and no action.

And again, Bernie Sanders -- it's really bad judgment. She has made bad judgment, not only on taxes. She had made bad judgments on Libya, on Syria, on Iraq. I mean, her and Obama, whether you like it or not, the way they got out of Iraq, the vacuum they've left -- that's why ISIS is formed in the first place.

They started from that little area. And now they're in thirty two different nations, Hillary. Congratulations. Great job.

Why didn’t you do it? Why didn’t you do it?

If you were an effective senator, you could have done it. If you were an effective senator, you could have done it. But you were not an effective senator.

She said a lot of things that were false. I think we should be allowed to -

First of all, she was there as the secretary of state with the so called line in the sand.

Excuse me. You were in total contact with the White House. And perhaps, sadly Obama probably still listened to you. I don't think he would be listening to you very much anymore. Obama draws the line in the sand, it was laughed at all over the world what happened. Now with that being said, she talks tough against Russia. But our nuclear program has fallen way behind. And they have gone wild with their nuclear program. Not good. Our government should not have allowed that to happen. Russia is new in terms of nuclear. We are old. We are tired. We are exhausted in terms of nuclear. A very bad thing. Now, she talks tough, she talks really tough against Putin. And against Assad. She talks in favor of the rebels. She doesn’t even know who the rebels are. Every time we take rebels. Whether it's in Iraq or anywhere else. We are arming people. And you know what happens? They end up being worse than the people. Look what she did and Libya with Gaddafi. Gadhafi is out. It’s a mess. And by the way ISIS has a good chunk of their oil.

I’m sure you probably have heard that. It was a disaster. Because the fact is that everything that she has done an foreign-policy has been at the stake and it has a been a disaster. And if you look at Russia -- is take a look at Russia and look at what they did this week. Where I agree she was not there, but possibly she was consulted. We sign a peace treaty, everyone's all excited. Well what Russia did with Assad, and by the way with Iran who made very powerful with the dumbest deal I have ever seen in the history of dealmaking with the Iran deal. With the 1.7 in cash, which is enough cash to fill this room. 

But look at that deal. Iran now and Russia are now against us. So she wants to fight, she wants to fight for rebels. There’s only one problem. You don’t even know who the rebels are.

And one thing I have to say is I don't like Assad at all. But Assad is killing ISIS. Russia is killing ISIS. And Iran is killing ISIS

And those three have now lined up because of our weak foreign policy.

Okay. He and I haven’t spoken and I disagree.

We have to knock out ISIS. Right now Syria is fighting ISIS. We have people that want to fight both at the same. But Syria's no longer Syria. Syria’s Russia and it’s Iran which she made strong, and Kerry, and Obama made into a very powerful nation. And a very rich nation. Very, very quickly. I believe we have to get ISIS. We have to worry about ISIS before we can get too much more involved. She had a chance to do something with Syria. They had a chance and that was the line.

I think Aleppo is a disaster humanitarian-wise.

I think that it basically has fallen. OK? It basically has fallen.

Let me tell you something, you take a look at Mosul. The biggest problem I have with the stupidity of our foreign policy. We have Mosul. They think a lot of the ISIS leaders are in Mosul. So we have a lot of announcements coming out of Washington and coming out of Iraq, we will be attacking Mosul in three weeks or four weeks. All of these bad leaders from ISIS are leaving Mosul. Why can't they do it quietly why can't they do the attack, make it a sneak attack. After the attack is made, inform the American public that we have knocked out the leaders, we’ve had tremendous success. People leave. Why do they have to say we're going to be attacking Mosul within the next four to six weeks? Which is what they are saying. How stupid is our country?

I can't think of any.

Look, I have two hundred generals and admirals who endorsed me. I have twenty one Congressional medal of honor recipients who endorsed me. We talk about it all the time. They understand why can't they do something secretively? Where they go in and they knock out the leadership. How -- why would these people stay there? I’ve been reading now for weeks...

I have a reading for weeks about Mosul that is the harbor between Raqqa and Mosul. This is where they think the ISIS leaders are.

Why would they be - they’re not staying there anymore. They are gone. Because everybody is talking about how Iraq, which is us with our leadership, goes in to fight Mosul. With these two hundred admirals and generals, they can't believe it. All they say is this. General George Patton, General Douglas MacArthur are spinning in their grave at the stupidity of what we're doing in the Middle East.

She went over a minute over, and you don't stop her. When I go one second over it's like -

It’s really very interesting.

Absolutely. I mean, uh, she calls our people deplorable, a large group. And irredeemable. I will be a president for all of our people. And I will be a president that will turn our inner cities around. And will give strength to people. And will give economics to people. And will bring jobs back because NAFTA, signed by her husband, is perhaps the greatest disaster trade deal in the history of the world. 

Not in this country. It stripped us of manufacturing jobs. We lost our jobs, we lost our money. We lost our plans. It is a disaster. And now she wants to sign TPP even though she says now she is for it. She called it the gold standard by the way at the last debate she lied because it turned out that she did say that it was the gold standard and she said that she didn't say it. They actually said that she lied. Okay. And she lied, but she's lied about a lot of things. I would be a president for all of the people.

African-Americans. The inner cities. Devastating what's happening to our inner cities. She's been talking about it for years. As usual, she talks about it, nothing happens. She doesn't get it done.

The same with the Latino Americans. The Hispanic Americans. The same exact thing, they talk, they don't get it done. You go into the inner cities and you see there's forty five percent poverty, African-Americans have forty five percent poverty in the inner cities. The education is a disaster. Jobs are essentially nonexistent. I mean, it’s -- you know and I have been saying it in big speeches where I have twenty and thirty thousand people what do you have to lose? It can't get any worse. And she has been talking about the inner cities for twenty five years. Nothing is going to ever happen.

Let me tell you, if she is president of the United States nothing is going to happen. It is going to be all talk, all of her friends, taxes we were talking, and I would just get it by osmosis, it’s not doing me any favors, but by doing all the others favor she would be doing me favors. But I will tell you, she is all talk, it doesn't get done. All you have to do is look at the Senate run, take a look at upstate New York.

It turned out to be a disaster.

We have a divided nation. We have a very divided nation. You look at Charlotte. You look at Baltimore. You look at the violence that's taking place in the inner cities, Chicago. You take a look at Washington, D.C. We have a increase in murder within our cities, the biggest in forty five years

We have a divided nation because people like her -- and believe me, she has tremendous hate in her heart. And when she said deplorables, she meant it. And when she said irredeemable -- they’re irredeemable, you didn’t mention that. But when she said their irredeemable, to me, that might have been even worse.

She's got tremendous hatred. And this country cannot take another four years of Barack Obama. And that's what you're getting with her.

No, there wasn’t check out a sex tape. 

It was just take a look at the person that she built up to be this wonderful Girl Scout, who was no Girl Scout.

By the way -- just so you understand -- when she said three o’clock in the morning take a look at Benghazi.

She said who’s going to answer the call at 3am in the morning? Guess what? She didn’t answer because when Ambassador Stevens --

She said she was awake at 3 o’clock in the morning and she also sent a tweet out at three o’clock in the morning, but I won’t even mention that. Guess what happened? Ambassador Stevens -  Ambassador Stevens sent six hundred requests for help and the only one she talked to was Sidney Blumenthal, who’s her friend, and not a good guy by the way. So, you know, she shouldn’t be talking about that. Now, tweeting happens to be a modern-day form of communication. I mean you can like it or not like it. I have, between Facebook and Twitter I have almost 25 million people. It’s a very effective way of communication. So you can put it down but it is a very effective form of communication. I’m not unproud of it, to be honest with you.

I’m shocked to hear that.

We have the slowest growth since 1929. Our country has the slowest growth and jobs are a disaster.

Justice Scalia, great judge, died recently, and we have a vacancy. I am looking to appoint judges very much in the mold of Justice Scalia. I’m looking for judges, and I’ve actually picked 20 of them, so that people would see, highly respected, highly thought of and actually very beautifully reviewed by just about everybody.

But people that will respect the Constitution of the United States, and I think that this is so important. Also the Second Amendment which is totally under siege by people like Hillary Clinton. They’ll respect the Second Amendment and what it stands for and what it represents. So important to me. Now Hillary mentioned something about contributions. Just so you understand, so I will have, in my race, more than 100 million put in of my money. Meaning I’m not taking all of this big money from all of these different corporations like she’s doing. What I ask is this. I’m putting in more - by the time it is finished, I’ll have more than 100 million dollars invested. Pretty much self-funding mine, we’re raising money for the Republican party and we’re doing tremendously under small donations, $61 average or so.

I ask Hillary - why doesn’t she make $250 million by being in office? She used the power of her office to make a lot of money. 

Why isn’t she funding -- not for $100 million, but why don’t you put $10 or $20 or $25 or $30 million into your own campaign? It’s $30 million less for special interests that will tell you exactly what to do, and it would really, I think, be a nice sign to the American public. Why aren’t you putting some money in? You have a lot of it, you’ve made a lot of it because of the fact that you’ve been in office. You’ve made a lot while you were secretary of state, actually. So why aren’t you putting money into your own campaign, just curious.

Absolutely. I think it’s such a great question, because energy is under siege by the Obama administration. Under absolute siege. The EPA - the Environmental Protection Agency -  is killing these energy companies. And foreign companies are now coming in, buying so many of our different plants and then rejiggering the plant so they can take care of their oil. We are killing, absolutely killing our energy business in this country. 

Now I’m all for alternative forms of energy, including wind, including solar, etc. But we need much more than wind and solar. And you look at our miners.

Hillary Clinton wants to put all the miners out of business. There is a thing called clean coal.

Coal will last for a thousand years in this country. Now we have natural gas and so many other things because of technology. We have unbelievable - we have found over the last seven years, we have found tremendous wealth right under our feet, so good. Especially when you have 20 trillion in debt. I will bring our energy companies back. They’ll be able to compete. They’ll make money. They’ll pay off our national debt. They’ll pay off our tremendous budget deficits -- which are tremendous.

But we are putting our energy companies out of business. We have to bring back our workers. You take a look at what’s happening to steel, and the cost of steel. And China dumping vast amounts of steel over the United States, which essentially is killing our steel workers and our steel companies.

We have to guard our energy companies. We have to make it possible - the EPA is so restrictive that they are putting our energy companies out of business.

And all you have to do is go to a great place like West Virginia or places like Ohio, which is phenomenal, or places like Pennsylvania, and you see what they’re doing to the people, miners and others in the energy business, it’s a disgrace. It’s an absolute disgrace.

Well, I consider her statement about my children to be a very nice compliment. I don't know if it was meant to be a compliment, but it is. I am very proud of my children, and they’ve done a wonderful job, and they’ve been wonderful, wonderful kids. So I consider that a compliment. I will say this about Hillary. She doesn't quit. She doesn't give up. I respect that. I tell it like it is. She's a fighter. I disagree with much of what she's fighting for. I do disagree with her judgment in many cases. But she does fight hard, and she doesn’t quit. And she doesn't give up, and I consider that to be a very good trait.

---

Well, first of all it’s great to be with you and thank you everybody. The Supreme Court - it’s what it's all about. Our country is so, just so imperative that we have the right justices. Something happened recently where Justice Ginsburg made some very, very inappropriate statements toward me and toward a tremendous number of people, many many millions of people that I represent. And she was forced to apologize. And apologize, she did. But these were statements that should have never, ever been made. 

We need a Supreme Court that in my opinion is going to uphold the Second Amendment and all amendments. But the Second Amendment, which is under absolute siege. I believe if my opponent should win this race, which I truly don't think will happen, we will have a second amendment which will be a very, very small replica of what it is right now.

But I feel that it's absolutely important that we uphold because of the fact that it is under such trauma. I feel that the justices that I am going to appoint-- and I've named 20 of them. The justices that I'm going to appoint will be pro-life. They will have a conservative bent. They will be protecting the Second Amendment. They are great scholars in all cases, and they are people of tremendous respect. They will interpret the Constitution the way the founders wanted it interpreted. And I believe that's very, very important. I don't think we should have justices appointed that decide what they want to hear It's all about the Constitution of -- and so important -- the Constitution, the way it was meant to be. And those are the people that I will appoint.

Well the D.C. versus Heller decision was very strongly and she was extremely angry about it I watched and she was very very angry when upheld and Justice Scalia was so involved and it was a well-crafted decision. But Hillary was extremely upset, extremely angry, and people that believe in the Second Amendment and believe in it very strongly were very upset with what she had to say.

Well, let me just tell you before we go any further in Chicago, which has the toughest gun laws in the United States, probably you could say by far, they have more gun violence than any other city. So we have the toughest laws and you have tremendous gun violence.

I am a very strong supporter of the Second Amendment and I am - I don't know if Hillary was sayin g it in a sarcastic manner - but I'm very proud to have the endorsement of the NRA and it’s the earliest endorsement they’ve ever given to anybody who ran for president. So I'm very honored by all of that. We are going to appoint justices, this is the best way to help the Second Amendment. We are going to appoint justices that will feel very strongly about the Second Amendment, that will not do damage to the Second Amendment.

Well, if that would happen because I am pro-life, and I will be appointing pro-life judges, I would think that that will go back to the individual states.

If they overturned it, it will go back to the states.

Well, if we put another two or perhaps three justices on that’s really what’s going to be -- that will happen. That will happen automatically in my opinion because I am putting pro-life justices on the court. I will say this it will go back to the states and the states will then make a determination.

Honestly, nobody it has business doing what I just said, doing that as late as one or two or three or four days prior to birth. Nobody has that.

Well, first of all she wants to give amnesty, which is a disaster and very unfair to all the people that are waiting on line for many many years.

We need strong borders. In the audience tonight we have four mothers of, I mean these are unbelievable people that I’ve gotten to know over a period of years, whose children have been killed, brutally killed, by people that came into the country illegally. You have thousands of mothers and fathers and relatives all over the country. They are coming in illegally. Drugs are pouring in through the border. We have no country if we have no border. Hillary wants to give amnesty she wants to have open borders. The border secure as you know the border patrol agents sixteen thousand five hundred plus, ICE endorsed me. First time they've ever endorsed a candidate.

And it means their job is tougher. But they know what's going on they know it today than anybody. They want strong borders. They feel we have to have strong borders. I was up in New Hampshire the other day the biggest complaint they have with all of the problems going on in the world, many of the problems caused by Hillary Clinton and by Barack Obama, all of the problems their single biggest problem, is heroine that pours across our southern borders just pouring and destroying their youth.

It's poisoning the blood of their youth and plenty of other people.

We have to have strong borders. We have to keep the drugs out of our country. We are right now we’re getting the drugs, they're getting the cash we need strong borders. We need absolute - we cannot give amnesty. Now, I want to build a wall. We need the wall the border patrol, ICE, they all want the wall.

We stopped the drugs we shore up the border. One of my first acts will be to get all of the drug lords, all of the bad ones, we have some bad bad people in this country that have to go out. Were going to get them out we're going to secure the border and once the border is secure at a later date we will make its determination as to the rest. But we have some bad hombres here that were going to get them out.

Chris, I think it, I think I should respond. First of all I had a very good meeting with the president of Mexico, very nice man, we will be doing very much better with Mexico on trade deals believe me. The NAFTA deal signed by her husband is one of the worst deals ever made of any kind of signed by anybody.

It's a disaster. 

Hillary Clinton wanted the wall. Hillary Clinton fought for the wall. In 2006 or thereabouts. Now she never gets anything done so naturally the wall wasn't built, but Hillary Clinton wanted the wall.

President Obama has moved millions of people out. Nobody knows about it, nobody talks about it, but under Obama, millions of people have been moved out of this country they’ve been deported she does want to say that but that's what happened. And that's what's happened big-league.

As far as moving these people out and moving we either have a country or we don't. We’re a country of laws, we either have a border or we don't. Now, you could come back in and you can become a citizen but it's very unfair. We have millions of people that did the right way they’re online they’re waiting we’re going to speed up the process big league because it's very inefficient. But they're online and they’re waiting to become citizens. Very unfair that somebody runs across the border becomes a citizen under her plan you have open borders you would have a disaster on trade and you will have a disaster with your open borders. But what she doesn't say is that President Obama has deported millions and millions of people just the way it is.

Thank you.

That was a great pivot off of the fact that she wants open borders, okay? When did we get off to Putin?

So just to finish on the borders. She wants open borders people are going to pour into our country people are going to come in from Syria. She wants five hundred and fifty percent more people than Barack Obama and he has thousands and thousands of people they have no idea where they come from. And you see we are going to stop radical Islamic terrorism in this country. She won't even mention the words and neither will President Obama. So I just want to tell you she wants open borders now we can talk about Putin. I don’t know Putin.

He said nice things about me. If we got along well that would be good. If Russia and the United States got along well and went after ISIS, that would be good. He has no respect for her. He has no respect for our president. And I'll tell you what, we’re in very serious trouble. Because we have a country with tremendous numbers of nuclear warheads, eighteen hundred by the way where they expanded and we didn't. Eighteen hundred nuclear warheads and she is playing chicken.

Look, Putin, from everything I see has no respect for this person.

No puppet. You’re the puppet.

She has no idea whether it's Russia China or anybody else. She has no idea.

She doesn’t like Putin because Putin has outsmarted at every step of the way, excuse me. Putin has outsmarted her in Syria, he has outsmarted her every step of the way.

By Russia or anybody else.

Of course I condemn.

I don't know Putin. I never met Putin this is not my best friend. But if the United States got along with Russia, wouldn’t so bad. Let me tell you, Putin has outsmarted her and Obama at every single step of the way, whether it’s Syria -- you name it, missiles -- take a look at the start up that they signed the Russians have said, according to many many reports, I can't believe they allowed us to do this. They create warheads and we can't. The Russians can't believe it. She has been outsmarted by Putin and all you have to do is look at the Middle East. They’ve taken over. We have spent six trillion dollars, they've taken over the Middle East. She has been outsmarted and outplayed worse than anybody I've ever seen in any government whatsoever.

And she always will be.

Wrong.

HILLARY CLINTON

.. Japan, Korea, even Saudi Arabia. He said, well if we had them why don't we use them? Which I think is terrifying. But here's the deal: the bottom line on nuclear weapons is that when the president gives the order, it must be followed. There is about four minutes between the order being given and the people responsible for launching nuclear weapons to do so. And that is why ten people who have had that awesome responsibility have come out in an unprecedented way said they would not trust Donald Trump with the nuclear codes or to have his finger on the nuclear button.

I have two hundred generals and admirals twenty one endorsing me, twenty one Congressional medal of honor recipients. As far as Japan and other countries, we are being ripped off by everybody -- we’re defending other countries. We are spending a fortune doing it they have a bargain of the century. All I said was we have to renegotiate these agreements because our country cannot afford to defend Saudi Arabia, Japan, Germany, South Korea and many other places. We cannot continue to afford.

She took that as saying nuclear weapons. Look, she's been proven to be a liar on so many different ways. This is just another lie.

And defend yourselves. I didn’t say nuclear -

Well, first of all before I start on my plan, her plan is going to raise taxes and even double your taxes. Her tax plan is a disaster and she can say all she wants about college tuition and I'm a big proponent, we're going to do a lot of things for college tuition, but the rest of the public is going to be paying for it. We will have a massive, massive tax increase under Hillary Clinton's plan.

But I’d like to start off where we left, because when I said Japan and Germany -- and I'm not just singling them out but South Korea -- these are very rich powerful countries. Saudi Arabia -- nothing but money, we protect Saudi Arabia. Why aren’t they paying?

She immediately when she heard this I questioned it and I questioned NATO. Why aren’t the NATO questions? Why aren’t they paying? Because they weren’t paying. Since I did this, this was a year ago - the NATO question where they paying? Since I did this this was a year ago all of a sudden they are paying. And I've been given a lot of credit for it and all the sudden they are starting to pay up.

We are protecting people they have to pay up and I'm a big fan of NATO but they have to pay up she comes out and says we love our allies we think our allies are great. Well, it's awfully hard to get them to pay up when you have someone saying we think how good they are.

We have to tell Japan and a very nice way we have to tell Germany all these countries we have a say you have to help us out. We have during his regime, during President Obama's regime, we have doubled our national debt. We are up to twenty trillion dollars. So my plan - we are going to renegotiate trade. We're going to have a lot of free trade, more free trade than we have right now. But we have horrible deals. Our jobs are being taken out by the deal that her husband signed - NAFTA - one of the worst deals ever. Our jobs are being sucked out of our economy. You look at all of the places that I just left - you go to Pennsylvania you  to go to Ohio. You go to Florida you go to any of them you go upstate New York, our jobs have fled to Mexico and other places. We are bringing our jobs back. I'm going to renegotiate NAFTA. And if I can’t make a great deal, then we’re going to terminate NAFTA t we're going to create new deals are going to terminate it we're going to make a great trade deal And if we can't, we’re going to go separate way because it has been a disaster. And it cut taxes massively. We’re going to cut business taxes massively. They’re start hiring people. We’re going to bring the two and a half trillion dollars that is offshore back into the country. We are going to start the engine rolling again because right now our country is dying at one percent GDP.

You can't.

Correct.

Over a ten year period -

So I just left some high representatives in India. They’re growing at eight percent. China is growing at seven percent, and that for them in the catastrophically low number. We are growing, our last report came out, it's right over from the one percent level. And I think it's going down. Last week, as you know, the end of last week, they came out with an anemic jobs report, a terrible jobs report. In fact I said, is that the last jobs report before the election because if it is, I should win easily -- it was so bad. The report was so bad.

Look, our country is stagnant. We've lost our jobs. 

We lost our businesses. We’re not making things any more, relatively speaking. Our product is pouring in from China, pouring in from Vietnam, pouring in from all over the world. I've visited so many communities -- this has been such an incredible education for me, Chris, I’ve gotten to know so many, I’ve developed so many friends over the last year. And they cry when they see what’s happened. I pass factories that were thriving twenty, twenty-five years ago. Because of the bill that her husband signed -- and she blessed one hundred percent, it is just horrible what’s happening to these people in these communities. Now, she can say her husband did well, but boy, did they suffer as NAFTA kicked in because it didn’t really kick in very much. But it kicked  in after they left -- boy did they suffer. That was one of the worst thing that ever happened in our country. Now she wants to sign transpacific partnership. And she wants it --  she lied when she said she didn't call it the gold standard in one of the debates. She totally lied -- and they actually fact checked, and they said I was right.

I asked a simple question. She's been doing this for thirty years. Why the hell didn't you do it over the last fifteen, twenty years?

Excuse me -- my turn. You are very much involved in every aspect of this country, very much. And you do have experience. I’ve said, the one thing you have over me is experience, but it’s bad experience because what you've done has turned out badly. For thirty years, you’ve been in a position to help. And if you say I've used steel or I used something else, make it impossible for me to do that. I wouldn’t mind. The problem is you talk, but you don't get anything done, Hillary, you don't. Just like when you're in the State Department, six billion dollars was missing. How do you miss six billion dollars? You ran the State Department. Six billion dollars was either stolen -- they don’t know. It’s gone. Six billion dollars. If you become president, this country is going to be in some mess. Believe me.

Well, I think I did a much better job. I built a massive company, a great company, some of the greatest assets anywhere in the world, worth many many billions of dollars.

I started with a one million dollar loan. I agree with that -- one million dollar loan. But I built a phenomenal company. And if we could run our country the way I've run my company, we would have a country that you would be so proud of. You would even be proud of it. And frankly, when you look at her real record, take a look at Syria. Take a look at the migration. Take a look at Libya. Take a look at Iraq. She gave us ISIS because her and Obama created this huge vacuum. And a small group came out of that huge vacuum because, we should have never been in Iraq, but once we were there we should have never gotten out the way they want to get out. She gave us ISIS as sure as you are sitting there. 

And what happened is now ISIS is in thirty two countries. Now I listen, she’s going to get rid of ISIS. She’s going to get rid of nobody.

First of all, the stories have been largely debunked. Those people, I don't know those people. I have a feeling how they came I believe it was her campaign that did it. Just like if you look at what came out today on the clips where I was wondering what happened with my rally in Chicago and other rallies where we had such violence? She's the one in Obama that caused the violence. They hired people. They payed them fifteen hundred dollars and there on tape saying be violent, cause fights, do bad things.

I would say the only way - because those stories are all totally false I have to say that. And I didn't even apologize to my wife, who is sitting right here, because I didn't do anything. I didn't know any of these women, I didn't see these women. These women, the woman on the plane, the woman -- I think they want either fame or her campaign did it and I think it's her campaign. Because what I saw what they did, which is a criminal act by the way, where there telling people to go out and start fistfights and start violence and I'll tell you what. In particular in Chicago, people were hurt and people could have been killed in that riot. And that was now, all on tape,  started by her.

I believe Chris that she got these people to step forward. If it wasn't, they get there ten minutes of fame. But they were all totally - it was all fiction. It was lies and it was fiction.

I did not say that.

I did not say that.

Nobody has more respect for women that I do, nobody. Nobody has more.

And frankly, those stories have been largely debunked and I really want to just talk about something slightly different. She mentions this - which is all fiction -- all fictionalized -- probably or possibly started by her and her very sleazy campaign but I will tell you what isn’t  fictionalized are her e-mails, where she destroyed thirty three thousand e-mails criminally criminally after getting a subpoena from the United States Congress. What happened to the FBI, I don't know. We have a great general - four-star general - today you read it in all the papers, going to potentially serve five years in jail for lying to the FBI one lie. She's lied hundreds of times to the people, to Congress, and to the FBI. He's going to probably go to jail. This is a four-star general and she gets away with it and she can run for the presidency of the United States.

So sad when she talks about violence at my rallies and she caused the violence. It's on tape.

The other things are false but honestly I'd love to talk about getting rid of ISIS and I’d love to talk about other things. But those other charges as she knows are false.

It’s a criminal enterprise -

It’s a criminal enterprise Saudi Arabia giving twenty five million dollars Qatar All these countries you talk about women and women's rights? So these are people that push gays off business, off buildings. These are people that kill women and treat women horribly and yet you take their money.

So I'd like to ask you right now why don't you give back the money that you’ve taken from certain countries that treat certain groups of people so horribly? Why don't you get back the money? I think would be a great gesture because she takes a tremendous amount of money and you take a look at the people of Haiti. I was at a Little Haiti the other day in Florida and I want to tell you they hate the Clintons. Because what’s happened in Haiti with the Clinton Foundation is a disgrace.

And you know it and they know it and everybody knows it.

They don't want you to help them anymore. I’d like to mention one thing. Trump Foundation, small foundation, people contribute I contribute the money goes one hundred percent one hundred percent goes to different charities including a lot of military. I don't get anything I don't buy boats. I don't buy planes whatever happens.

No, we put up  American flag and that's it. They put up the American flag. We fought for the right in Palm Beach to put up the American flag.

And the money went to Fisher House where they build houses the money that you're talking about went to Fisher House with a build houses for veterans and disabled veterans.

We’re entitled because of the laws that people like her past to take massive amount of depreciation and other charges and we do it. And all of her donors, just about all of them, I know Buffett took hundreds of millions of dollars, Soros - George Soros - took hundreds of millions of dollars but I just explain all of her donors most of her donors have done the same thing as I do.

And you know she should've done? And Hillary what you should've done you should've changed the law when you were a United States Senator. Because your donors and your special interest are doing the same thing as I do except even more so you should have changed a lot but you won't change the law because you take so much money I mean I sat in my apartment today on a very beautiful hotel down the street

I sat there I said there watching ad after ad after ad , false ads, all paid for by your friends on Wall Street gave so much money because they know you're going to protect them and frankly you should have changed the laws. If you don't like what I did you should've changed the law.

I will look at it at the time. I'm not looking anything now I will look at it at the time. What I've seen, what I've seen it so bad. First of all the media is so dishonest and so corrupt and the pile on is so amazing that the New York Times actually wrote an article about it that they don't even care. It's so dishonest and they poison the minds of the voters but unfortunately for them I think the voters are seeing through it.

I think they’re going to see right through it. We will find out on November eighth but I think they’re going to see through it. Excuse me Chris if you look at your voter rolls you will see millions of people that are registered to vote, millions, this isn't coming for me this is coming from Pew Report and other places millions of people that are registered to vote that shouldn't be registered to vote so let me just give you one other thing.

I talk about the corrupt media I talk about the millions of people I’ll tell you on other thing. She shouldn't be allowed to run. It’s -- she's guilty of a very very serious crime. She should not be allowed to run. And just in that respect I say it's rigged because, Chris, she should never have been allowed to run for the presidency based on what she did with e-mails and so many other things.

What I'm saying now is I will tell you at the time. I will keep you in suspense, okay?

Should have gotten it.

I think what the FBI did and what the Department of Justice did, including meeting with her husband, the attorney general, in the back of an airplane on the tarmac in Arizona - I think that is disgraceful. I think it is disgraceful. 

I think we've never had a situation so bad.

Let me tell you. Mosul is so sad. We had Mosul but when she left, when she took everybody out, we lost Mosul and now we are fighting again to get Mosul. The problem with Mosul and what they wanted to do is they wanted to get the leaders of ISIS who they felt were in Mosul. About three months ago, I started reading that they want to get the leaders and they’re going to attack Mosul. What ever happened to the element of surprise? We announce we’re going after Mosul, I’ve been reading we’ve been going after Mosul, how long has it been Hillary, three months?

These people have all left they've all left. They’ve all left. The element of surprise. Douglas MacArthur George Patton, spinning in their graves when they see the stupidity of our country.

So we’re now fighting for Mosul, that we had, all she had to do was stay there and now we're going in to get it, but you know the big winner in Mosul is going to be after we eventually get it and the only reason they got it is because she's running for the office of president.

And they want to look tough. They want to look good. He violated the red line in the sand. And he made so many mistakes. That is why we have the great migration. But she wanted to look good for the election. But who is going to get Mosul really? We will take eventually. If you look at what's happening much more tougher it's going to be more deaths than we thought. But the leaders I wanted to get are all wrong is because they're smart. What do we need this for? So Mosul is going to be a wonderful thing and Iran should write us a letter of thank you, just like the other really stupid. The stupidest deal of all time. A deal that's going to give Iran absolutely nuclear weapons.

Iran should write us yet another letter saying thank you very much because Iran as I said many years ago Iran is taking over Iraq. Something they wanted to do forever but we made it so easy for them. So we're now going to take Mosul and you knows who is going to be the beneficiary? Iran. Boy are they - they are outsmarting -- look you are not there you might be involved in that decision but you were there when you took everybody out of Mosul and out of Iraq. We shouldn’t have been Iraq but you did vote for it. You shouldn't have been in Iraq but once you're in Iraq you should have never left the way -- the point is the big winner is going to be Iran.

Wrong.

Wrong.

Iran is taking over Iraq.

No, you are the one that is unfit. WikiLeaks just actually came out John Podesta said some horrible things about you and boy was he right. He said some beauties and you know, Bernie Sanders he said you had bad judgment. You do. And if you think that going into Mosul after we left the world know we're going in and all the people we really wanted - the leaders - they’re are all gone. If you think that was good, then you do. Now John Podesta said you have terrible instincts. Bernie Sanders said you have bad judgment. I agree with both.

It’s a catastrophe. Have you seen it? Have you seen what’s happened to Aleppo?

That’s right and they are being slaughtered because of bad decisions.

Aleppo is a disaster. It is a humanitarian nightmare but it has fallen from any standpoint. I mean what do you need a signed document? Take a look at Aleppo it's so sad when you see what's happened. 

And a lot of this is because of Hillary Clinton because what's happened is by fighting Assad, who turned out to be a lot tougher than she thought - and now she's going to say oh he loves Assad - he's just much tougher and much smarter than her and Obama.

And everyone thought he was gone two years ago three years ago. He aligned with Russia he now also aligned with Iran who we made very powerful. We gave them a hundred fifty million dollars back. We get them 1.7 billion in cash bundles of cash as big as this stage. We gave them 1.7 billion dollars. Now they have aligned -- he has aligned with Russia and with Iran. They don't want ISIS but they have other things because we are backing we are backing rebels. We don't know who the rebels are. We are giving them lots of money, lots of everything. We don't know who the rebels are. And when and if -- it's not going to happen because you have Russia and you have Iran now -- but if they ever did overthrow Assad you might end up with, as bad as Assad is, and he's a bad guy. But you very may very well end up with worse than Assad. If she did nothing we would be in much better shape. And this is what's caused the great migration where she's taking in tens of thousands of Syrian refugees who probably in many cases -- not probably who are definitely in many cases ISIS aligned - and we now have them in our country and wait until you see this is going to be the great Trojan horse and wait until you see what happens in the coming years. Lots of luck Hillary, thanks a lot for doing a great job.

But I just have to -- it’s so ridiculous with -- she will defeat ISIS. We should have never let ISIS happen in the first place and right now they are in thirty two countries.

Wait one second. They had a ceasefire three weeks ago. A ceasefire, United States, Russia and Syria. And during the cease-fire, Russia took over vast swathes of land. And then they said, we don't want the cease-fire anymore. We are so outplayed on missiles, on ceasefires. They are outplayed. Now she was not there -- I assume she had nothing to do with it. But our country is so outplayed by Putin and Assad and, by the way, and by Iran. Nobody can believe how stupid our leadership is.

Well, I say they're wrong because I'm going to create tremendous jobs. And we’re bringing GDP from really one percent, which is what it is now. If she got in, it’ll be less than zero. But we’re bringing it from one percent up to four percent. And I actually think we can go higher than 4 percent. I think you can go to 5 or 6 percent.  

And if we do, you don't have to bother asking your question because we have a tremendous machine. We will have created a tremendous economic machine once again. To do that, we’re taking back jobs. We’re not going to let our companies be raided by other countries. Where we lose all our jobs, we don’t make our product anymore.

It's very sad. But I'm going to create a -- the kind of a country that we were from the standpoint of industry. We used to be there. We’ve given it up. We’ve become very, very sloppy. We've had people that are political hacks making the biggest deals in the world -- bigger than companies, you take these big companies -- these trade deals are far bigger than these companies. And yet, we don't use our great leaders, many of whom back me and many of whom back Hillary, I must say. But we don’t use those people -- those are the people these the greatest negotiators in the world. We have the greatest business people in the world. We have to use them to negotiate our trade deals. We use political hacks. We use people that get the position because they gave -- they made a campaign contribution. And they’re dealing with China and people that are very much smarter than they are. So we have to use our great people. But with that being said, we will create an economic machine, the likes of which we haven't seen in many decades. And people, Chris, will again go back to work and they’ll make lot of money and we’ll have companies that will grow and expand and we’ll start from new.

Thank you, Hillary.

HILLARY CLINTON

it's a difference that affects how we see the world and what we want to do the economy.

Can I just respond?

I did disagree with Ronald Reagan very strongly on trade. I disagreed with him. We should have been the much tougher on trade even then. I’ve been waiting for years and nobody does it right. And frankly, now we’re going to do it right.

I'm cutting taxes. We’re going to grow the economy. It’s going to grow at a record rate.

It’s going to totally help you.  And one thing we have to do, repeal and replace the disaster known as Obamacare. 

It’s destroying our country, it’s destroying our businesses. Our small business and our big businesses -- we have to repeal and replace Obamacare. You take a look at the kind of numbers that that will cost us in the year seventeen, it is a disaster, if we don't repeal and replace -- now it’s probably going to die of its own weight. But Obamacare has to go. Its -- premiums are going up sixty, seventy, eighty percent. 

Next year, they’re going to go up over one hundred percent. And I'm really glad that the premiums have started -- at least the people see what happening because she wants to keep Obamacare. And she wants to make it even worse. And it can't get any worse. Bad healthcare at the most expensive price -- we have to repeal and replace Obamacare.

Such a nasty woman.

She's raising the money from the people she wants to control. It doesn't work that way. But when I started this campaign, I started it very strongly. It’s called make America great again. Were going to make America great. We have a depleted military. It has to be helped. Has to be fixed. We have the greatest people on earth in our military. We don't take care of our veterans. We take care of illegal immigrants, people that come into the country illegally, better than we take care of our vets. That can’t happen. Our policemen and women are disrespected. We need law and order. But we need justice too. Our inner cities are a disaster. You get shot walking to the store.

They have no education. They have no jobs. I will do more for African-Americans and Latinos than she can ever do in ten lifetimes. All she’s done is talk to the African-Americans and to the Latinos. But they get the vote and then they come back and say, We'll see you in four years. We are going to make America strong again, and we are going to make America great again. And it has to start now. We cannot take four more years of Barack Obama. And that's what you get when you get her.
